District of Columbia statutes.
2-556

Documents to be filed with Administrator.

Except as provided in § 2-554, 2 copies of any document to be published pursuant to this subchapter shall be filed with the Administrator. The Administrator shall immediately review filed documents to determine their conformity to the provisions of this subchapter and to editorial standards promulgated by the Administrator. Upon the Administrator’s determination of a document’s conformity with this section, 1 copy of each document shall be prepared for publication and 1 copy kept for permanent historic preservation.

History

Oct. 21, 1968, Pub. L. 90-614, title III, § 306
as added Mar. 6, 1979, D.C. Law 2-153, § 4, 25 DCR 6960

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1536.
1973 Ed., § 1-1536.